Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 5
WATER RESOURCES

Article 1

General Provisions.

Article 2

Control of Water Pollution and Surface-Water Use.

Article 3

Wells and Drinking Water.

Part 1

G

ENERAL PROVISIONS

.

Part 2

G

ROUND-WATER USE GENERALLY

.

Part 3

W

ATER WELL STANDARDS

.

Part 4

A

RTESIAN WELLS

.

Part 5

P

UBLIC WATER SYSTEMS

.

Part 6

W

ATER SYSTEM INTERCONNECTION, REDUNDANCY, AND RELIABILITY

.

Article 4

Coastal Waters, Beaches, and Sand Dunes.

Part 1

G

ENERAL PROVISIONS

.

Part 2

S

HORE PROTECTION

.

Part 3

P

RESERVATION AND MANAGEMENT OF COASTAL ZONE

.

Part 4

C

OASTAL MARSHLANDS

.

Part 5

S

EA OATS

.

Part 6

C

OASTAL MANAGEMENT

.

Article 5

Rivers and River Basins.

Part 1

G

ENERAL PROVISIONS

.

Part 2

G

EORGIA SCENIC RIVER SYSTEM

.

Part 3

D

AM SAFETY

.

Part 4

D

EVELOPMENT OF CHATTAHOOCHEE RIVER BASIN

.

Part 5

D

EVELOPMENT OF ALTAMAHA RIVER BASIN

.

Part 6

P

ROTECTION OF METROPOLITAN RIVERS

.

Article 6

Water Supply.

Article 7

Costs of Oil Spill Response.

Article 8

Comprehensive State-wide Water Management Planning.

Article 9

Flint River Drought Protection.

Article 10

Metropolitan North Georgia Water Planning District.

Cross references.

- Water rights, T. 44, C. 8.

Protection of tidewaters, T. 52, C. 1, A. 1.

Right of passage on navigable streams and rivers, T. 52, C. 1, A. 2.

Intracoastal waterway, T. 52, C. 3.

River and harbor development, T. 52, C. 9.

Law reviews.

-
For survey article on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 145 (1982). For article, "From Marshes to Mountains, Wetlands Come Under State Regulation," see 41 Mercer L. Rev. 865 (1990).